Hawaii statutes.
[§667-20.1] Postponement, cancellation of sale. (a) The public sale may be either postponed or canceled by the court-appointed
commissioner. Notice of the postponement or the cancellation
of the public sale shall be:

(1) Announced by the court-appointed
commissioner at the date, time, and place of the last
scheduled public sale; and

(2) Provided to:

(A) The mortgagor, the borrower, and the
foreclosing mortgagee;

(B) Any prior or junior creditors who have a
recorded lien on the mortgaged property before the commencement of the
foreclosure action; and

(C) Any party named in the foreclosure action
and any prospective bidder who requested notice of the public sale date or any
change in the public sale date.

(b)
If there is a postponement of the public sale of the mortgaged property, the
court-appointed commissioner shall have a new public notice
of the public sale published once in the format described in section 667-20. The new public notice shall state that it is a notice of a
postponed sale. The public sale shall take place no sooner than fourteen days
after the date of the publication of the new public notice. Not less than
fourteen days before the rescheduled date of the
public sale, a copy of the new public notice of the rescheduled public sale
shall be posted on the mortgaged property or on another real property of which
the mortgaged property is a part, and it shall be mailed or
delivered to the mortgagor, the borrower, the foreclosing mortgagee, and any other person entitled to receive notification of
the foreclosure action under subsection (a)(2).

(c)
Upon the fourth postponement of every series of four consecutive postponements,
the court-appointed commissioner shall follow all of
the public notice of public sale requirements of section 667-20. [L 2013, c 181, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next